Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.508J of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 2609 Page 1


A. The State Department of Education shall establish and


maintain the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program to provide


tutoring in the subject of reading to students in grades


prekindergarten through three.


B. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Cohort” means a student or group of students of no more


than five who receive subject-specific high dosage tutoring in


reading and are at least one-half grade level behind in reading


prior to participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program;


and


2. “High dosage tutoring” means in-person, subject-specific


tutoring conducted by an individual employed by or contracted with a


school district participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring


Program after school hours for a minimum of three one-hour sessions


per week per cohort. Tutoring shall be conducted during a minimum


of ten (10) weeks in the fall semester and a minimum of twelve (12)


weeks in the spring semester.


C. 1. Participating school districts shall assess


prekindergarten through third grade students participating in high


dosage reading tutoring using the screening instrument required by


Section 1210.508C of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to track


academic growth.


2. Results of screening instruments administered pursuant to


this subsection shall be electronically reported to the State

Req. No. 2609 Page 2


Department of Education three times a year at intervals determined


by the Department.


D. The State Department of Education shall give priority for


participation in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program to school


districts federally designated for additional targeted support and


improvement or comprehensive support and improvement under the


Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as reauthorized by


P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act.


Participation in the program shall be approved on a first-come,


first-served basis without any limitation other than the amount of


funds available for the program and the number of school districts


that apply.


E. High dosage tutors employed by or contracted with public


school districts participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring


Program shall be awarded bonuses in the following amounts:


1. One Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($1,600.00) for each cohort


educated by a high dosage tutor per semester; and


2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each academic grade


level increase in reading that each student within a cohort


experiences within one academic year.


F. 1. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort do not


improve by at least half a grade level in reading within the first


year of the program, the tutor shall be placed on a conditional one-


year term of participation.

Req. No. 2609 Page 3


2. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort fail to


achieve half a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional


term of participation, he or she shall lose eligibility to


participate in the program. A tutor who loses eligibility pursuant


to this paragraph may be reconsidered as a high dosage tutor after


two years.


3. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort achieve half


a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional term of


participation, the tutor’s conditional status shall be lifted.


G. High dosage tutors shall be provided the necessary


information for each student’s academic performance level in


reading, as determined by the student’s current teacher.


H. 1. School districts participating in the Oklahoma High


Dosage Tutoring Program shall obtain written consent from a


student’s parent or legal guardian prior to allowing the student to


participate in high dosage tutoring.


2. If a student participating in high dosage tutoring fails to


attend a tutoring session, the tutor shall notify the student’s


school district, and the school district shall notify the student’s


parent or legal guardian.


3. If the parent or legal guardian of a student participating


in high dosage tutoring no longer wishes for the student to


participate, a student fails to attend nine high dosage tutoring


sessions during a semester, or a student’s behavior during tutoring

Req. No. 2609 Page 4


sessions requires disciplinary action, the student may be removed


from the cohort. The performance of a student subject to the


provisions of this paragraph shall not count against the high dosage


tutor.


I. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.508K of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the State Department of Education to be designated the “High


Dosage Tutoring Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing


fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of


all monies received by the State Department of Education from gifts,


grants, donations, bequests, federal funds provided for the purpose


of funding high dosage tutoring, or state appropriations provided


for the purpose of implementing the provisions of Section 1 of this


act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State


Department of Education for the purpose provided for in this


section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.

Req. No. 2609 Page 5


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2609 EB 12/22/2025 11:00:24 AM



































Req. No. 2609 Page 6